Utah statutes.
32B-9-302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "120 hour single event permit" means a single event permit that authorizes under this part the storage, sale, offering for sale, furnishing, and consumption of liquor for a period not to exceed 120 consecutive hours.

(2)  "72 hour single event permit" means a single event permit that authorizes under this part the storage, sale, offering for sale, furnishing, and consumption of liquor for a period not to exceed 72 consecutive hours.

(3)  "Single event permit" means:

(a)  a 120 hour single event permit; and

(b)  a 72 hour single event permit.

